Utah statutes.
41-6a-1116.   Electric personal assistive mobility devices -- Conflicting provisions -- Restrictions -- Penalties.

(1) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, an electric personal assistive mobility device is subject to the provisions under this chapter for a bicycle, moped, or a motor-driven cycle.

(b)  For a person operating an electric personal assistive mobility device, the following provisions do not apply:

(i)  seating positions under Section 41-6a-1501;

(ii)  required lights, horns, and mirrors under Section 41-6a-1506;

(iii)  entitlement to full use of a lane under Subsection 41-6a-1502(1); and

(iv)  driver licensing requirements under Section 53-3-202.

(2)  A person under 15 years of age may not operate an electric personal assistive mobility device using the motor unless the person is under the direct supervision of the person's parent or guardian.

(3)  A person may not operate an electric personal assistive mobility device:

(a)  on a highway consisting of a total of four or more lanes designated for regular vehicular traffic;

(b)  on a highway with a posted speed limit greater than 35 miles per hour; or

(c)  that has been structurally or mechanically altered from the original manufacturer's design.

(4)  An owner may not authorize or knowingly permit a person to operate an electric personal assistive mobility device in violation of this section.

(5)  A person may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device on a sidewalk if the operation does not:

(a)  exceed a speed which is greater than is reasonable or prudent having due regard for weather, visibility, and pedestrians; or

(b)  endanger the safety of other persons or property.

(6)  A person operating an electric personal assistive mobility device shall yield to a pedestrian or other person using a mobility aid.

(7) (a)  An electric personal assistive mobility device may be operated on:

(i)  a path or trail designed for the use of a bicycle; or

(ii)  on a highway where a bicycle is allowed if the speed limit on the highway does not exceed 35 miles per hour.

(b)  A person operating an electric personal assistive mobility device in an area described in Subsection (7)(a)(i) or (ii) is subject to the laws governing bicycles.

(8)  A person may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device at night if the device is equipped with or the operator is wearing:

(a)  a lamp pointing to the front that emits a white light visible from a distance of not less than 300 feet in front of the device; and

(b)  front, rear, and side reflectors.

(9)  A person may not operate an electric personal assistive mobility device while carrying an article that prevents the person from keeping both hands on the handlebars or interferes with the person's ability to safely operate the electric personal assistive mobility device.

(10)  Only one person may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device at a time.

(11)  A person may not park an electric personal assistive mobility device on a highway or sidewalk in a manner that obstructs vehicular or pedestrian traffic.

(12)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

